firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
bitümlemek/≗
bölümlemek/≗
bürümek/≗
bütünlemek/≗
büyüksemek/≗
büyülemek/≗
büyümek/≗
büyümsemek/≗
büzgülemek/≗
büğemek/≗
dökümlemek/≗
döllemek/≗
dörtlemek/≗
döşemek/≗
düdüklemek/≗
dürtüklemek/≗
dürtüşlemek/≗
dürümlemek/≗
düzemek/≗
düzlemek/≗
düğümlemek/≗
düşlemek/≗
eşgüdümlemek/≗
göllemek/≗
gömülemek/≗
görüntülemek/≗
göynümek/≗
gözemek/≗
gözlemek/≗
gözlemek/≗
göğüslemek/≗
gücümsemek/≗
güdülemek/≗
güdümlemek/≗
gülümsemek/≗
gümbürdemek/≗
gümlemek/≗
gümrüklemek/≗
gümüşlemek/≗
günlemek/≗
günülemek/≗
gürlemek/≗
gürüldemek/≗
güzlemek/≗
hüngürdemek/≗
indüklemek/≗
köhnemek/≗
köklemek/≗
köpülemek/≗
körlemek/≗
körüklemek/≗
kösnümek/≗
kötülemek/≗
kötümsemek/≗
közlemek/≗
kükremek/≗
kükürtlemek/≗
küllemek/≗
küngürdemek/≗
küremek/≗
kürnemek/≗
kürümek/≗
kütlemek/≗
kütürdemek/≗
küçüklemek/≗
küçüksemek/≗
küçümsemek/≗
löklemek/≗
mühürlemek/≗
nötrlemek/≗
pörsümek/≗
pörtlemek/≗
püflemek/≗
sansürlemek/≗
siyanürlemek/≗
sölpümek/≗
sönümlemek/≗
söylemek/≗
söğüşlemek/≗
südremek/≗
sülfürlemek/≗
sümek/≗⊎⊏⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕
süngülemek/≗
sürgülemek/≗
sürüklemek/≗
sürümek/≗
süslemek/≗
trollemek/≗
törpülemek/≗
tükürüklemek/≗
tümlemek/≗
tünemek/≗
tüplemek/≗
türemek/≗
türkülemek/≗
tütsülemek/≗
yüklemek/≗
yülümek/≗
yürümek/≗
yüzlemek/≗
züğürtlemek/≗
çözgülemek/≗
çözümlemek/≗
çürümek/≗
ödemek/≗
ödünlemek/≗
öksemek/≗
ölçümlemek/≗
ölçünlemek/≗
önemek/≗
önlemek/≗
öremek/≗
örgütlemek/≗
örklemek/≗
öykülemek/≗
özemek/≗
özgülemek/≗
özlemek/≗
özümlemek/≗
özümsemek/≗
özütlemek/≗
öğürtlemek/≗
öğütlemek/≗
üflemek/≗
ünlemek/≗
üremek/≗
ürümek/≗
üstünsemek/≗
üstüpülemek/≗
ütülemek/≗
üçlemek/≗
üşümek/≗
şakullemek/≗
